da: Lukkemekanisme: Tryk-for-at-åbne; Selvlukkende; Soft-close; Standard; Andet
vi: Cơ chế đóng: Nhấn để mở; Tự đóng; Đóng êm; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
hu: Zárómechanizmus: Nyomásra nyíló; Önzáró; Lágy záródású; Normál; Egyéb
el: Μηχανισμός κλεισίματος: Push-to-open; Αυτόματο κλείσιμο; Soft-close; Τυπικός; Άλλο
bg-BG: Затварящ механизъм: Отваряне с натискане; Самозатварящ се; Плавно затваряне; Стандартен; Други
nb: Lukkemekanisme: Trykk for å åpne; Selvlukkende; Myklukking; Standard; Annet
fi: Sulkemismekanismi: Painamalla avattava; Itsesulkeutuva; Pehmeästi sulkeutuva; Vakio; Muu
ja: 閉鎖メカニズム: プッシュオープン; セルフクローズ; ソフトクローズ; スタンダード; その他
sk-SK: Zatvárací mechanizmus: Push-to-open; Samozatvárací; Tlmené zatváranie; Štandardný; Iné
de: Schließmechanismus: Push-to-open; Selbstschließend; Soft-Close; Standard; Andere
lt-LT: Uždarymo mechanizmas: Atidarymas paspaudus; Savaiminis užsidarymas; Švelnus užsidarymas; Standartinis; Kita
hr-HR: Mehanizam za zatvaranje: Otvaranje na potisak; Samozatvarajuće; Meko zatvaranje; Standardno; Ostalo
th: กลไกการปิด: กดเพื่อเปิด; ปิดเองอัตโนมัติ; ซอฟต์โคลส; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
it: Meccanismo di chiusura: Push-to-open; Autochiudente; Chiusura ammortizzata; Standard; Altro
sl-SI: Zapiralni mehanizem: Pritisni za odpiranje; Samozapiranje; Mehko zapiranje; Standardno; Drugo
en: Closing mechanism: Push-to-open; Self-close; Soft-close; Standard; Other
fr: Mécanisme de fermeture: Ouverture par pression; Fermeture automatique; Fermeture amortie; Standard; Autre
ro-RO: Mecanism de închidere: Deschidere prin apăsare (push-to-open); Închidere automată (self-close); Închidere lentă (soft-close); Standard; Altele
cs: Dovírací mechanismus: Otevírání zatlačením (push-to-open); Samozavírací; Tiché dovírání (soft-close); Standardní; Jiný
zh-CN: 闭合机制: 按压开启; 自动关闭; 缓冲关闭; 标准; 其他
pt-PT: Mecanismo de fecho: Pressionar para abrir; Fecho automático; Fecho suave; Padrão; Outro
pt-BR: Mecanismo de fechamento: Push-to-open; Fechamento automático; Fechamento suave; Padrão; Outros
sv: Stängningsmekanism: Tryck för att öppna; Självstängande; Mjukstängande; Standard; Övrigt
tr: Kapanma mekanizması: Bas-aç; Kendiliğinden kapanan; Yavaş kapanan; Standart; Diğer
ru: Механизм закрывания: Открытие нажатием (Push-to-open); Самозакрывающийся; С плавным закрыванием; Стандартный; Другое
nl: Sluitmechanisme: Push-to-open; Zelfsluitend; Softclose; Standaard; Overig
es: Mecanismo de cierre: De presión para abrir; Cierre automático; Cierre suave; Estándar; Otro
zh-TW: 關閉機制: 按壓彈開; 自動關閉; 緩衝關閉; 標準; 其他
pl: Mechanizm zamykania: Naciśnij i otwórz (push-to-open); Samodomykający; Ciche domykanie; Standardowy; Inny
ko: 닫힘 메커니즘: 푸시투오픈; 자동 닫힘; 소프트 클로즈; 표준; 기타